Nevada, session 83, SB3.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 332.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
332.195 1. [Except as otherwise provided in this section, a] A
governing body or its authorized representative may enter into a
contract pursuant to a solicitation by:
(a) A governmental entity located within or outside this State
with the authorization of the contracting vendor. The originally
-
*SB3*

– 2 –
contracting local government is not liable for the obligations of the
governmental entity which enters into a contract in response to the
solicitation in accordance with this paragraph.
(b) The State of Nevada or another state with the authorization
of the contracting vendor. The State of Nevada or other state is not
liable for the obligations of the local government which enters into a
contract in response to the solicitation in accordance with this
paragraph.
(c) A cooperative purchasing organization. A cooperative
purchasing organization is not liable for the obligations of the local
government which enters into a contract in response to the
solicitation in accordance with this paragraph.
2. [A governing body or its authorized representative shall not
enter into a contract pursuant to this section if a contractor’s license
issued pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS is required for any portion of
the work to be performed under the contract.
3.] As used in this section, “cooperative purchasing
organization” means an organization that implements a cooperative
arrangement to agree to aggregate demand on behalf of public
entities for the purpose of obtaining lower prices from certain
suppliers to reduce the costs of procurement.
H
-
*SB3*